Maine, session 132, LD1931.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §662 is enacted to read:
§662. Reimbursement to Town of Charleston
The Treasurer of State shall annually reimburse the Town of Charleston an amount
equal to 43% of the property tax revenue loss suffered by the town during the previous
calendar year as a result of the exemption from property tax afforded to the Mountain View
Correctional Facility pursuant to section 651.